Massachusetts, session 194th, S797.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 100A of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, is hereby
amended by adding the following two sections:-
Section 15. There shall be, within the division of insurance, an auto body labor rate
advisory board to address any issues related to auto body labor rates. The advisory board shall
consist of: 1 member appointed by the commissioner of insurance; 1 member appointed by the
attorney general; 1 member appointed by the director of the division of insurance standards; 3
members from the auto insurance industry appointed by the Automobile Insurers Bureau of
Massachusetts, 1 of whom shall be chosen by the three members to serve as co-chair; 3 members
from the auto repair industry from different geographic regions of the Commonwealth appointed
by the Alliance of Automotive Service Providers of Massachusetts, Inc., 1 of whom shall be
of 3

chosen by the three members to serve as co-chair; 1 member appointed by the Massachusetts
State Automobile Dealers Association, Inc.; and 4 members appointed by the co-chairs, 1 of
whom shall be from vocational-technical schools, 2 of whom shall be from a consumer advocacy
group and 1 of whom shall be an economists with expertise on the insurance industry.
The advisory board shall meet not less than 2 times per year. The advisory board shall be
responsible for creating, implementing and overseeing an annual survey given to relevant auto
body shops as determined by the advisory board. The survey should compile data pertaining to
contracted hourly labor rates, posted hourly labor rates and prevailing hourly labor rates and any
additional information the advisory board deems relevant. The advisory board shall collect
industry data including, but not limited to: (i) labor rates in neighboring states; (ii) auto body
shop costs; (iii) total labor costs; (iv) inflation data; (v) work force data; (vi) vocational school
trends; (vii) insurance premiums; and (viii) any additional information as requested by the
advisory board. The results of the survey and the data collected shall be reviewed and analyzed
by the advisory board annually and the board shall make a recommendation for a fair and
equitable labor rate.
Annually, not later than December 31, the advisory board shall file a report of its
findings, conclusions and any recommendations with the clerk of the senate and house of
representatives, the joint committee on financial services, the senate and house committees on
ways and means and the division of insurance.
Section 16. Not more than 30 days after receiving the annual report from the auto body
labor rate advisory board under section 15, the commissioner of insurance shall set a minimum
hourly labor rate that insurers shall pay on insured claims for repairs made by registered motor
of 3

vehicle repair shops; provided, however, that the minimum hourly labor rate shall not be less
than $55. The minimum hourly labor rate shall go into effect 30 days after it is set by the
commissioner.
of 3